test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-luojk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Evensyllable adjectives that belong to 

# With attribute -s.

Tests:

  Adjective - senijlla: # 
    senijlla+A+Attr: [senijla, senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlla, senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Sg+Acc: [senijlav, senijlalattjav]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalabbo, senijlap]
    senijlla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalamos, senijlamus]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalappot, senijlabut]
    senijlla+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlamusát, senijlalabmusit]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlabusj, senijlalappusj]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalapputjit, senijlabuttjat]
    senijlla+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalattjat, senijlat]
    senijlla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Adjective - ekvivalænnta: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    ekvivalænnta+A+Attr: [ekvivalenta, ekvivalentalasj]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalännta, ekvivalænnta, ekvivalentalasj]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Sg+Com: [ekvivalentajn, ekvivalentalattjajn]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentalabbo, ekvivalentap]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentalamos, ekvivalentamus]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentabusj, ekvivalentalappusj]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ekvivalentabuttjat, ekvivalentalapputjit]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ekvivalentalattjat, ekvivalentat]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - destruktijvalasj: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    destruktijvva+A+Attr:  [destruktijvalasj, destruktijva]
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalasj, destruktijvva]
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Ela: [destruktijvalattjas, destruktijvas]
    destruktijvva+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalabbo, destruktijvap]
    destruktijvva+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalamos, destruktijvamus]
